Wyoming, session 2026, SF0107.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-236 is created to read:
31-2-236. Motor vehicle registration and license
plate issuance system.
(a) As used in this section, "motor vehicle
registration and license plate issuance system" means a
statewide electronic motor vehicle registration and license
plate issuance system implemented and administered by the
department that supports all functions necessary to
register motor vehicles and issue license plates under this
title.
(b) The department shall implement and administer a
motor vehicle registration and license plate issuance
system not later than July 1, 2028. The motor vehicle
registration and license plate issuance system shall, at a
minimum:
(i) Record and process all motor vehicle
registration transactions, including initial registrations,
renewals, transfers, corrections, replacements and any
other transactions as authorized by the department;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) Facilitate the issuance, replacement and
renewal of license plates, validation stickers, decals,
temporary permits and any other related items as determined
by the department;
(iii) Calculate, accept payment for and document
motor vehicle registration fees under W.S. 31-3-101 and
31-3-102;
(iv) Calculate, accept payment for and document
specialty license plate fees and donations related to
specialty license plates;
(v) Calculate, accept payment for and document
sales and use taxes pursuant to W.S. 39-15-107(b) or
39-16-107(b);
(vi) Possess the capacity to exchange
information and operate in a manner that is compatible with
the county treasurers' systems to enable the
reconciliation, balancing and distribution of all fees and
taxes collected through the system in accordance with the
law.
(c) The department may contract with one (1) or more
vendors to develop, implement and provide ongoing
administration of the motor vehicle registration and
license plate issuance system required under subsection (b)
of this section.
(d) The department may charge a transaction fee of
not more than five dollars ($5.00) for each transaction
processed through the motor vehicle registration and
license plate issuance system to recover the department's
costs associated with the maintenance and ongoing
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
administration of the system. No transaction fee shall be
charged under this subsection to the counties. Before
establishing a transaction fee or changing an existing
transaction fee under this subsection, the department shall
provide written notice to each county treasurer of the
amount of the transaction fee and the date the transaction
fee will take effect. No transaction fee charged under this
subsection shall be reduced or deducted from any fees,
taxes or distributions owed to other persons under the law.
(e) Upon activation of the motor vehicle registration
and license plate issuance system, all county treasurers
shall use the system to carry out the county treasurers'
duties under this title related to motor vehicle
registration and license plate issuance.
Section 2. W.S. 31-1-202(c) and (d) as amended by
2025 Wyoming Session Laws Chapter 35, Section 2 and
effective July 1, 2027, is amended to read:
31-1-202. Records.
(c) Within three (3) business days after issuance of
a vehicle registration or certificate of title, county
treasurers and county clerks shall forward a record thereof
to the department. County clerks shall forward a record of
certificate of title electronically through the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113.
County treasurers shall forward records of vehicle
registration electronically through the motor vehicle
registration and license plate issuance system established
under W.S. 31-2-236. County treasurers shall notify the
department and sheriff of his county of loss or mutilation
of license plates.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(d) The department shall maintain records of vehicle
registrations in the motor vehicle registration and license
plate issuance system established under W.S. 31-2-236 from
all counties indexed by distinctive vehicle numbers
assigned by the department, the name of the registered
owner and vehicle identification numbers. The department
shall maintain a record of all vehicle certificates of
title from all counties in the electronic lien and title
system established under W.S. 31-2-113. Records are public
and open to inspection by the public during reasonable
office hours. The department shall maintain a vehicle
identification number index of all vehicles for which
certificates of title have been issued. Upon receipt of a
notice of issuance of a certificate of title from any
county clerk the department may destroy all records
relating to former transfers of title to the vehicle and
shall retain only the notice of issuance of the certificate
of title in effect at any time. The department may annually
compile and publish a list of all registered vehicles and
supplements thereto which shall be furnished to Wyoming
peace officers and the Wyoming office of homeland security
without charge.
Section 3. The development and implementation of the
motor vehicle registration and license plate issuance
system as required under section 1 of this act shall be
considered part of the replacement of the revenue
information system and shall be eligible for funding under
W.S. 31-1-204.
Section 4.
(a) The department of transportation shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) The department of transportation may contract
with one (1) or more vendors to develop and implement the
motor vehicle registration and license plate issuance
system as authorized and required under section 1 of this
act.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0107
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2028.
(b) Sections 3 through 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6